extras/dictionaries/la.aff
SFX G Y 195
SFX G io      io              io        
SFX G io      ioque           io        
SFX G io      ione            io        
SFX G io      iove            io        
SFX G io      is              io        
SFX G io      isque           io        
SFX G io      isne            io        
SFX G io      isve            io        
SFX G io      it              io        
SFX G io      itque           io        
SFX G io      itne            io        
SFX G io      itve            io        
SFX G io      imus            io        
SFX G io      imusque         io        
SFX G io      imusne          io        
SFX G io      imusve          io        
SFX G io      itis            io        
SFX G io      itisque         io        
SFX G io      itisne          io        
SFX G io      itisve          io        
SFX G io      iunt            io        
SFX G io      iuntque         io        
SFX G io      iuntne          io        
SFX G io      iuntve          io        
SFX G io      iebam           io        
SFX G io      iebamque        io        
SFX G io      iebamne         io        
SFX G io      iebamve         io        
SFX G io      iebas           io        
SFX G io      iebasque        io        
SFX G io      iebasne         io        
SFX G io      iebasve         io        
SFX G io      iebat           io        
SFX G io      iebatque        io        
SFX G io      iebatne         io        
SFX G io      iebatve         io        
SFX G io      iebamus         io        
SFX G io      iebamusque      io        
SFX G io      iebamusne       io        
SFX G io      iebamusve       io        
SFX G io      iebatis         io        
SFX G io      iebatisque      io        
SFX G io      iebatisne       io        
SFX G io      iebatisve       io        
SFX G io      iebant          io        
SFX G io      iebantque       io        
SFX G io      iebantne        io        
SFX G io      iebantve        io        
SFX G io      iam             io        
SFX G io      iamque          io        
SFX G io      iamne           io        
SFX G io      iamve           io        
SFX G io      ies             io        
SFX G io      iesque          io        
SFX G io      iesne           io        
SFX G io      iesve           io        
SFX G io      iet             io        
SFX G io      ietque          io        
SFX G io      ietne           io        
SFX G io      ietve           io        
SFX G io      iemus           io        
SFX G io      iemusque        io        
SFX G io      iemusne         io        
SFX G io      iemusve         io        
SFX G io      ietis           io        
SFX G io      ietisque        io        
SFX G io      ietisne         io        
SFX G io      ietisve         io        
SFX G io      ient            io        
SFX G io      ientque         io        
SFX G io      ientne          io        
SFX G io      ientve          io        
SFX G io      ias             io        
SFX G io      iasque          io        
SFX G io      iasne           io        
SFX G io      iasve           io        
SFX G io      iat             io        
SFX G io      iatque          io        
SFX G io      iatne           io        
SFX G io      iatve           io        
SFX G io      iamus           io        
SFX G io      iamusque        io        
SFX G io      iamusne         io        
SFX G io      iamusve         io        
SFX G io      iatis           io        
SFX G io      iatisque        io        
SFX G io      iatisne         io        
SFX G io      iatisve         io        
SFX G io      iant            io        
SFX G io      iantque         io        
SFX G io      iantne          io        
SFX G io      iantve          io        
SFX G io      ierem           io        
SFX G io      ieremque        io        
SFX G io      ieremne         io        
SFX G io      ieremve         io        
SFX G io      ieres           io        
SFX G io      ieresque        io        
SFX G io      ieresne         io        
SFX G io      ieresve         io        
SFX G io      ieret           io        
SFX G io      ieretque        io        
SFX G io      ieretne         io        
SFX G io      ieretve         io        
SFX G io      ieremus         io        
SFX G io      ieremusque      io        
SFX G io      ieremusne       io        
SFX G io      ieremusve       io        
SFX G io      ieretis         io        
SFX G io      ieretisque      io        
SFX G io      ieretisne       io        
SFX G io      ieretisve       io        
SFX G io      ierent          io        
SFX G io      ierentque       io        
SFX G io      ierentne        io        
SFX G io      ierentve        io        
SFX G io      i               io        
SFX G io      ique            io        
SFX G io      ine             io        
SFX G io      ive             io        
SFX G io      ite             io        
SFX G io      iteque          io        
SFX G io      itene           io        
SFX G io      iteve           io        
SFX G io      ito             io        
SFX G io      itoque          io        
SFX G io      itone           io        
SFX G io      itove           io        
SFX G io      itote           io        
SFX G io      itoteque        io        
SFX G io      itotene         io        
SFX G io      itoteve         io        
SFX G io      iunto           io        
SFX G io      iuntoque        io        
SFX G io      iuntone         io        
SFX G io      iuntove         io        
SFX G io      ieri            io        
SFX G io      ierique         io        
SFX G io      ierine          io        
SFX G io      ierive          io        
SFX G io      ore             io        
SFX G io      oreque          io        
SFX G io      orene           io        
SFX G io      oreve           io        
SFX G io      uturus          io        
SFX G io      uturusque       io        
SFX G io      uturusne        io        
SFX G io      uturusve        io        
SFX G io      uturi           io        
SFX G io      uturique        io        
SFX G io      uturine         io        
SFX G io      uturive         io        
SFX G io      uturo           io        
SFX G io      uturoque        io        
SFX G io      uturone         io        
SFX G io      uturove         io        
SFX G io      uturum          io        
SFX G io      uturumque       io        
SFX G io      uturumne        io        
SFX G io      uturumve        io        
SFX G io      uture           io        
SFX G io      utureque        io        
SFX G io      uturene         io        
SFX G io      utureve         io        
SFX G io      utura           io        
SFX G io      uturaque        io        
SFX G io      uturane         io        
SFX G io      uturae          io        
SFX G io      uturaeque       io        
SFX G io      uturaene        io        
SFX G io      uturaeve        io        
SFX G io      uturam          io        
SFX G io      uturamque       io        
SFX G io      uturamne        io        
SFX G io      uturamve        io        
SFX G io      uturorum        io        
SFX G io      uturorumque     io        
SFX G io      uturorumne      io        
SFX G io      uturorumve      io        
SFX G io      uturarum        io        
SFX G io      uturarumque     io        
SFX G io      uturarumne      io        
SFX G io      uturarumve      io        
SFX G io      uturis          io        
SFX G io      uturisque       io        
SFX G io      uturisne        io        
SFX G io      uturisve        io        
SFX G io      uturos          io        
SFX G io      uturosque       io        
SFX G io      uturosne        io        
SFX G io      uturosve        io        
SFX G io      uturas          io        
SFX G io      uturasque       io        
SFX G io      uturasne        io        
